Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-925
Misuse of official information; penalty.

(1) Any public servant, in contemplation of official action by himself or by a governmental unit with which he is associated, or in reliance on information to which he has access in his official capacity and which has not been made public, commits misuse of official information if he:

(a) Acquires pecuniary interest in any property, transaction, or enterprise which may be affected by such information or official action; or

(b) Speculates or wagers on the basis of such information or official action; or

(c) Aids, advises, or encourages another to do any of the foregoing with intent to confer on any person a special pecuniary benefit.

(2) Misuse of official information is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 210.